Hawaii statutes.
[§245-33] Unused stamps; cancellation of
stamps. The department shall adopt rules for a refund or credit to a
licensee in the amount of the denominated values of any unused stamps. The
department may provide by rule for the cancellation of stamps. [L 2000, c 249,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next